Florida, session 2026, HB1137.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
49
50 Section 1. Section 561.1215, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1137 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1137 2026 Legislature
51 to read:
52 561.1215 Deductions for breakage, spoliation, evaporation,
53 expiration, and extraordinary losses.—
54 (1)(a) Distributors of vinous, spirituous, or malt
55 beverages may make deductions against any excise tax due under
56 s. 563.05, s. 564.06, or s. 565.12 on their monthly tax report
57 for alcoholic beverages that have become unsellable through
58 warehouse breakage, spoliation, evaporation, or expiration or
59 that have become unfit for human consumption, in an amount equal
60 to the following:
61 1. For vinous beverage sales, 0.49 percent of gross tax.
62 2. For spirituous beverage sales, 0.15 percent of gross
63 tax.
64 3. For malt beverage sales, 0.20 percent of gross tax or
65 the actual breakage or spoliation.
66 (b) The method of determining breakage for malt beverages,
67 either percentage or actual gallonage, must be elected annually
68 and will be effective for 1 calendar year unless the license is
69 transferred or 100 percent of the stock is sold to a new owner.
70 (c) Distributors that distribute more than one type of
71 alcoholic beverage shall deduct the gross taxes for their
72 products as prescribed in this subsection for vinous,
73 spirituous, or malt beverages.
74 (2)(a) Extraordinary losses of vinous, spirituous, or malt
75 beverages are excluded from the deductions in subsection (1).
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1137 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1137 2026 Legislature
76 For purposes of this section, the term "extraordinary loss"
77 means an unusual loss resulting from acts of God or nature which
78 are not expected to recur; accidents that occur during
79 interstate or intrastate shipment from manufacturer to
80 distributor, from distributor to distributor, or from
81 distributor to retailer; or products being recalled by a
82 manufacturer and destroyed by a distributor. The term does not
83 include a loss from evaporation, breakage, or spoliation
84 incurred on the licensed premises in the normal course of
85 business which exceeds the standard deductions prescribed in
86 subsection (1).
87 (b) A distributor shall immediately notify the division
88 when an extraordinary loss occurs. A distributor may deduct the
89 actual gallonage of the extraordinary loss. The distributor
90 shall show proof of the extraordinary loss before recovering or
91 crediting any excise tax due to the unsellable alcoholic
92 beverages by:
93 1. Providing a copy of a traffic accident investigation
94 report or an incident report from the investigating agency when
95 the loss occurs in transit;
96 2. Having the extraordinary loss witnessed or documented
97 by an authorized division employee when the extraordinary loss
98 occurs on the premises of the distributor; or
99 3. Clearly and objectively establishing the extraordinary
100 loss through appropriate documentation as determined by the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1137 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1137 2026 Legislature
101 division.
102 (c) The distributor shall show proof of the destruction,
103 dumping, or recycling of the alcoholic beverages involved in the
104 extraordinary loss by providing a statement to the division from
105 the distributor, or the distributor's authorized employee or
106 agent, evidencing such destruction, dumping, or recycling. The
107 statement must include a description of the location of the
108 extraordinary loss; the alcoholic beverages, by gallonage and
109 tax category, which have been destroyed, dumped, or recycled;
110 and the location of the site where the alcoholic beverages were
111 destroyed, dumped, or recycled.
112 (3)(a) Upon notification by a distributor, the division
113 shall inspect any remaining undamaged invoiced inventory
114 intended to be distributed.
115 (b)1. A distributor reporting extraordinary losses must
116 furnish proof that the excise tax has not been recovered from
117 any other source. The distributor shall provide the division
118 with copies of all insurance claims and receipts of payment upon
119 request by the division.
120 2. The distributor shall record on forms prescribed by the
121 division the actual gallonage of breakage, spoliation, or
122 evaporation of alcoholic beverages; the date of product
123 destruction; the quantity destroyed, by tax classification; and
124 a statement signed by the distributor, or the distributor's
125 authorized employee or agent, that the product was destroyed.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1137 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1137 2026 Legislature
126 3. The division shall retain all completed forms for 3
127 years.
128 (4) The division may adopt rules and forms to implement
129 this section.
130 (5) This section applies retroactively to January 1, 2025.
131 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1137 -01-er